test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-met_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - met: # Noun  'eng husband, pt marido' - partial paradigm
# 
     met+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: omet # my husband
     met+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: emet # your(sg) husband
     met+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: imet # his/her husband
     met+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3c: semet # his/her husband
     met+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl12: kimet # our husband
     met+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: osemet # our husband
     met+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: eyatmet # your(pl) husband
     met+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: teyatmet # their husband
     met+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3c: seteyatmet # their husband
# 
     met+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: omet # my husband
     met+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: emeteri # your(sg) husband
     met+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: imeteri # his/her husband
     met+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3c: semeteri # his/her husband
     met+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl12: kimeteri # our husband
     met+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: osemeteri # our husband
     met+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: eyatmeteri # your(pl) husband
     met+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: teyatmeteri # their husband
     met+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3c: seteyatmeteri # their husband
